fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Aliments > Boulangerie: Bagels; Assortiments de desserts; Pains; Gâteaux et barres dessert; Gâteaux au café; Cookies; Crêpes; Petits gâteaux; Donuts; Fudge; Cornets de crème glacée; Gâteaux de lune; Muffins; Pâtisseries et scones; Tartes et tartelettes; Tacos; Tortillas et wraps; Gaufres
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Produse alimentare > Brutărie: Covrigi; Sortimente de produse de panificație; Pâine și chifle; Prăjituri și batoane desert; Prăjituri pentru cafea; Fursecuri; Clătite; Mini-prăjituri; Gogoși; Caramele; Conuri de înghețată; Prăjituri de lună; Brioșe; Produse de patiserie și biscuiți; Plăcinte și tarte; Tortilla pentru taco și tostada; Tortilla și lipii; Vafe
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Potraviny > Pečivo: Bagely; Směsi zákusků; Chléb a pečivo; Zákusky; Pečivo ke kávě; Sušenky; Palačinky; Košíčky; Koblihy; Máslový karamel – fudge; Zmrzlinové kornouty; Měsíční koláčky; Koláče; Sladké pečivo; Koláče a dortíky; Placky na tacos; Tortily a wrapy; Vafle
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Voedselitems > Bakkerij: Bagels; Patisserieproducten; Brood en bolletjes; Cake- en dessertrepen; Koffiegebak; Koekjes; Crêpes; Cupcakes; Donuts; Fudge; IJshoorntjes; Maancakes; Muffins; Gebak en scones; Pasteien en taarten; Tacoschelpen; Tortilla's en wraps; Wafels
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Lebensmittel > Backwaren: Bagels; Backwaren-Mischungen; Brot & Brötchen; Kuchen; Kuchen zum Kaffee; Plätzchen; Crêpes; Cupcakes; Donuts; Karamell-Fudge; Eistüten; Mondkuchen; Muffins; Feingebäck; Pasteten & Torten; Tacoschalen; Tortillas & Wraps; Waffeln
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Alimenti > Prodotti da forno: Bagel; Prodotti da forno assortiti; Pane e focacce; Torte e dessert; Torte al caffè; Biscotti; Crêpe; Cupcake; Ciambelle; Fudge; Coni per gelati; Mooncake; Muffin; Pasticcini e focaccine da tè; Torte e crostate; Tortillas per taco; Tortilla e involti; Waffle
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 식품 > 제과/제빵: 베이글; 모둠 빵; 빵/번; 케이크/디저트 바; 커피 케이크; 쿠키; 크레페; 컵케이크; 도넛; 퍼지; 아이스크림 콘; 월병; 머핀; 페이스트리/스콘; 파이/타르트; 타코 셸/토스타다; 토르티야/랩; 와플
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Maisto prekės > Kepiniai: Beigeliai; Kepinių rinkiniai; Duona ir bandelės; Tortai ir desertai; Kavos pyragaičiai; Pyragaičiai; Krepai; Keksiukai; Spurgos; Fadžas; Ledų kūgiai; Mėnulio pyragai; Mafinai; Pyragaičiai ir angliškos bandelės; Pyragai ir tartos; Takai ir tostados; Tortilijos ir suktinukai; Vafliai
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Prehrambeni izdelki > Pekovski izdelki: Bagete; Asortimenti pekovskih izdelkov; Kruh in žemlje; Pecivo in sladice; Kavne torte; Piškoti; Palačinke; Kolački; Krofi; Maslena karamela; Sladoledni korneti; Lunine torte; Mafini; Pecivo in kruhki; Pite in torte; Taco školjke in tostade; Tortilje in zavitki; Vaflji
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Alimentos > Panadería: Bagels; Surtidos de pasteles; Panes y bollería; Barras de postres y pasteles; pastelitos para el café; Galletas; Crepas; Cupcakes; Donuts; Dulce de azúcar; Cucuruchos de helado; Pasteles de luna; Magdalenas; Pastelitos empaquetados; Pasteles y tartas; Tortas para tacos; Tortillas y wraps; Waffles
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Пищевые продукты > Выпечка: Бейглы; Наборы разной выпечки; Хлебобулочные изделия; Торты и десерты; Кексы к кофе; Печенье; Крепы; Кексы; Пончики; Молочный ирис; Рожки для мороженого; Лунные пряники; Маффины; Пирожные и булочки-сконы; Пироги и тарты; Лепешки для тако; Тортильи и лаваши; Вафли
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Alimentos > Padaria: Bagels; Bandejas de pães, bolos e sobremesas; Pães e pãezinhos doces; Bolos e sobremesas em forma de barra; Bolos de café; Biscoitos; Crepes; Cupcakes; Donuts; Fudge; Casquinhas de sorvete; Bolos da lua; Muffins; Pastelaria; Bolos e tortas; Conchas para tacos; Tortilhas e wraps; Waffles
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Livsmedel > Bakning: Bagels; Urval av bageriprodukter; Bröd och bullar; Tårtor och efterrättskakor; Kaffebröd; Kakor; Crêpes; Cupcakes; Munkar; Fudge; Glasstrutar; Månkakor; Muffins; Bakelser och scones; Pajer och mördegstårtor; Tacoskal; Tortillas och wraps; Våfflor
th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > รายการอาหาร > เบเกอรี่: เบเกิล; ส่วนผสมเบเกอรี; ขนมปัง; เค้กและบาร์ของหวาน; เค้กสำหรับทานกับกาแฟและชา; คุกกี้; เครป; คัพเค้ก; โดนัท; ฟัดจ์; ไอศกรีมโคน; ขนมไหว้พระจันทร์; มัฟฟิน; ขนมอบและสโคน; พายและทาร์ต; ทาโค เชลและทอสทาด้า; ทอทิล่าและแผ่นห่อ; วาฟเฟิล
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Hàng thực phẩm > Bánh mỳ: Bánh sừng bò; Mặt hàng bánh mỳ và bánh ngọt; Bánh bột mỳ; Bánh ngọt và món tráng miệng; Bánh cà phê; Bánh quy; Bánh crêpe; Bánh cupcake; Bánh rán vòng; Bánh fudge; Kem ốc quê; Bánh trung thu; Bánh muffin; Bánh ngọt và bánh nướng có nhân dạng dẹt; Bánh nướng có nhân bên trong; Vỏ bánh taco và bánh tostadas; Bánh tráng ngô Tortilla và bánh dạng cuộn; Bánh waffle
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Prehrambeni artikli > Pekara: Bagelsi; Pekarski proizvodi; Kruh i peciva; Torte i kolači; Čajni keksi; Keksi; Palačinke; Cupcakesi; Krafne; Čokoladne pločice; Korneti za sladoled; Mjesečevi kolači; Muffini; Slastice i pogačice; Slane i slatke pite; Tortilje za taco i tostadu; Tortilje i wrapovi; Vafli
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 食品 > 烘焙坊: 貝果; 綜合餅乾; 麵包; 蛋糕和點心棒; 佐咖啡蛋糕; 餅乾; 可麗餅; 杯子蛋糕; 甜甜圈; 乳脂軟糖; 冰淇淋餅乾杯; 月餅; 瑪芬鬆餅; 糕點/司康; 派/塔; 塔可餅和墨西哥比薩; 墨西哥捲餅皮; 鬆餅
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Matvarer > Bakeri: Bagels; Bakeriutvalg; Brød og rundstykker; Kaker og dessertbarer; Kaffekaker; Småkaker; Crêpes; Cupcakes; Donuts; Fudge; Iskremkuler; Månekaker; Muffins; Søte bakervarer og scones; Paier og terter; Tacoskjell og tostadas; Tortillaer og wraps; Vafler
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Artigos alimentares > Panificação: Bagels; Sortido de padaria; Pães e pãezinhos; Bolos e barras de sobremesa; Bolos de café; Bolachas; Crepes; Cupcakes; Donuts; Fudge; Cones de gelado; Bolos lunares; Queque; Pastelaria e scones; Tortas e tartes; Taco Shells e tostadas; Tortilhas e wraps; Waffles
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Хранителни продукти > Печива: Гевреци; Хлебни продукти; Хлябове и хлебчета; Торти и десертни блокчета; Сладкиши с кафе; Бисквитки; Крепове; Кексчета; Легла тип „поничка“; Фъдж; Фунийки за сладолед; Лунни кексчета; Мъфини; Сладкиши и кифли; Пайове и тартове; Такоси и тостади; Тортила хлебчета и питки; Вафли
ja: 食品・飲料 > 食品 > ベーカリー: ベーグル; 焼き菓子詰め合わせ; パン; ケーキ・スティックケーキ; コーヒーケーキ; クッキー; クレープ; カップケーキ; ドーナツ; ファッジ; アイスクリームコーン; 月餅; マフィン; デニッシュ・スコーン; パイ・タルト; タコシェル; トルティーヤ・ラップ; ワッフル
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Potraviny > Pečivo: Bagely; Sortiment pekárenských výrobkov; Chleby a žemle; Zákusky a dezerty; Kávové zákusky; Sušienky; Palacinky; Košíčky; Šišky; Fudge; Zmrzlinové kornútky; Mesačné koláče; Muffiny; Pečivo a čajové koláčiky; Koláče a tarty; Taco mušle a tostadas; Tortilly a wrapy; Vafle
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Yiyecek Çeşitleri > Unlu Mamuller: Simitler; Unlu Mamul Çeşitleri; Ekmek ve Çörekler; Kekler ve Tatlı Çubuklar; Kahveli Kek; Kurabiyeler; Krepler; Fincan Keki; Donat; Çikolatalı Yumuşak Şekerleme; Dondurma Külahları; Ay kekleri; Mafin; Tatlı ve Tuzlu Hamur İşleri; Pastalar ve Turtalar; Taco Kabukları; Tortillalar ve Dürümler; Waffle
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Είδη διατροφής > Αρτοποιεία: Μπέιγκελς (Bagels); Ποικιλίες αρτοποιίας; Ψωμιά & ψωμάκια; Κέικ & μπάρες για επιδόρπιο; Κέικ καφέ; Μπισκότα; Κρέπες; Cupcakes; Ντόνατς; Φατζ; Χωνάκια παγωτού; Φεγγαρόπιτες (mooncakes); Μάφιν; Γλυκά & Scones (κέικ ψημένα στη σχάρα); Πίτες & τάρτες; Βάσεις για τάκος & τοστάδας; Τορτίγιας & περιτυλιγμένα προϊόντα; Βάφλες
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Fødevarer > Bagning: Bagels; Bageriudvalg; Brød og boller; Kager og dessertbarer; Kaffekager; Småkager; Crêpes; Cupcakes; Donuts; Fudge; Isvafler; Månekager; Muffins; Bagværk og scones; Tærter; Tacoskaller; Tortilla og wraps; Vafler
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Ruokatuotteet > Leivonnaiset: Bagelit; Leivoslajitelmat; Leivät ja pullat; Kakut ja leivospalat; Kahvikakut; Keksit; Ohukaiset; Kuppikakut; Donitsit; Kermakarkit; Jäätelötuutit; Kuukakut; Muffinit; Leivonnaiset ja skonssit; Piirakat ja tortut; Tacokuoret ja tostadat; Tortillat ja wrapit; Vohvelit
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Żywność > Wypieki: Bajgle; Mieszanki ciastek; Chleby i bułki; Ciasta; Ciasta do kawy; Ciastka; Crêpes; Babeczki; Pączki; Krówki; Rożki do lodów; Ciasteczka księżycowe; Muffiny; Ciasta i bułki drożdżowe; Placki i tarty; Muszle do taco; Tortille i wrapy; Gofry
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 食品 > 烘焙食品: 百吉饼; 烘培食品什锦; 面包/小面包; 蛋糕/甜品; 咖啡蛋糕; 饼干/曲奇; 可丽饼; 纸杯蛋糕; 甜甜圈; 乳脂软糖; 冰淇淋甜筒; 月饼; 松饼; 糕点/司康饼; 馅饼/挞; 墨西哥玉米卷/玉米饼; 玉米饼/卷; 华夫饼
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Élelmiszertételek > Péksütemény: Bagelek; Péksütemény-válogatások; Kenyerek és zsemlék; Sütemények és desszertszeletek; Kávésütemények; Aprósütemények; Crêpe-ek; Cupcake-ek; Fánkok; Fudge; Fagylaltkúpok; Holdsütemények; Muffinok; Sütemények és pogácsák; Piték és torták; Tacohéjak és tostadák; Tortilla és wrapek; Gofrik
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Food Items > Bakery: Bagels; Bakery Assortments; Breads & Buns; Cakes & Dessert Bars; Coffee Cakes; Cookies; Crêpes; Cupcakes; Donuts; Fudge; Ice Cream Cones; Mooncakes; Muffins; Pastries & Scones; Pies & Tarts; Taco Shells & Tostadas; Tortillas & Wraps; Waffles